Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-19,164
Foreign corporation organized prior to January 1, 1997; status.

Any corporation organized under the laws of any other state or territory which had become, in accordance with section 21-1966.01, as such section existed prior to January 1, 1997, a body corporate of this state, shall retain such status for all purposes notwithstanding the repeal of such section.

Laws 1996, LB 681, § 164.